New York, session 2025-2026, A6345.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new article 49-D 2 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 49-D 4 COMMISSION ON PUBLIC SAFETY, EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS, AND MENTAL HEALTH 5 Section 997. Definitions. 6 997-a. Commission on public safety, emergency preparedness, and 7 mental health. 8 997-b. Division of school safety. 9 997-c. Division of emergency preparedness. 10 997-d. Division of mental health. 11 997-e. Community engagement and public oversight. 12 997-f. Utilization of other agency assistance. 13 997-g. Reports. 14 § 997. Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms shall 15 have the following meanings: 16 1. "commission" shall mean the commission on public safety, emergency 17 preparedness, and mental health established by this article. 18 2. "state agency" shall mean the state and any department, division, 19 board, bureau, commission or agency of the state or any political subdi- 20 vision thereof. 21 § 997-a. Commission on public safety, emergency preparedness, and 22 mental health. 1. There is hereby created within the executive depart- 23 ment a commission on public safety, emergency preparedness, and mental 24 health consisting of the superintendent of state police, commissioner of 25 the division of homeland security and emergency services, commissioner EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08247-01-5 A. 6345 2 1 of education, the chairperson of the disaster preparedness commission, 2 the commissioner of health, and the commissioner of mental health. Each 3 member agency may designate an executive level officer of that agency, 4 with responsibility for disaster preparedness matters, who may represent 5 that agency on the commission. 6 2. The commission shall elect a chair, vice-chair, and any other 7 necessary officers from among the members of the commission. A majority 8 of the members of the commission then in office shall constitute a 9 quorum for the transaction of business or the exercise of any power or 10 function of the commission. The commission, on call of the chairperson, 11 shall meet at least quarterly and at such other times as may be neces- 12 sary. The agenda and meeting place of all regular meetings shall be made 13 available to the public in advance of such meetings and all such meet- 14 ings shall be open to the public. An act, determination or decision of 15 the majority of the members present during the presence of a quorum 16 shall be held to be the act, determination, or decision of the commis- 17 sion. 18 3. The members of the commission shall be allowed their actual and 19 necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under 20 this article but shall receive no additional compensation for services 21 rendered pursuant to this article. 22 4. The commission shall have the following powers and responsibil- 23 ities: 24 (a) work with the division of school safety, division of emergency 25 preparedness, and the division of mental health to provide resources, 26 training, and support to schools and the community, as well as promote 27 awareness and reduce the stigma surrounding mental health. 28 (b) work with local emergency management agencies and mental health 29 organizations to improve the community's ability to respond to natural 30 disasters, public health emergencies, and other critical incidents. 31 (c) address critical issues related to public safety, emergency 32 preparedness, and mental health. 33 (d) provide a comprehensive approach to public safety, emergency 34 preparedness, and mental health. 35 (e) improve the overall safety and well-being of the community. 36 (f) provide resources and support to schools and the community to 37 promote mental health awareness and reduce the stigma surrounding mental 38 health. 39 (g) prioritize community engagement and public oversight. 40 § 997-b. Division of school safety. The division of school safety 41 shall be responsible for ensuring the safety of students, teachers, and 42 staff in schools. The division of school safety shall consist of the 43 members of the commission with representatives from local law enforce- 44 ment, school administrators, and school safety experts. The division of 45 school safety shall provide training and resources to schools, including 46 but not limited to threat assessments, school safety drills, and active 47 shooter response plans. 48 § 997-c. Division of emergency preparedness. The division of emergency 49 preparedness shall be responsible for developing and implementing emer- 50 gency preparedness plans for the community. The division of emergency 51 preparedness shall consist of the members of the commission with repre- 52 sentatives from local emergency management agencies, first responders, 53 and public health officials. The division of emergency preparedness 54 shall improve the ability of communities to respond to natural disas- 55 ters, public health emergencies, and other critical incidents. A. 6345 3 1 § 997-d. Division of mental health. The division of mental health 2 shall be responsible for promoting mental health awareness in schools 3 and the community. The division of mental health shall consist of the 4 members of the commission with representatives from local mental health 5 organizations, school counselors, and mental health professionals. The 6 division of mental health shall provide mental health resources and 7 training to schools, as well as support and referrals for students, 8 teachers, and staff. 9 § 997-e. Community engagement and public oversight. The commission 10 shall maintain a website where a member of the public can leave a public 11 comment on the commission. The commission shall also conduct hearings at 12 least twice a year where the public can comment on the commission. One 13 such hearing shall occur in a city with a population of one million or 14 more and another such hearing shall not occur in a city with a popu- 15 lation of one million or more. 16 § 997-f. Utilization of other agency assistance. All state agencies 17 are hereby authorized and directed to provide assistance and available 18 resources, as requested by the commission, in order to effectuate the 19 purposes of this article. 20 § 997-g. Reports. The commission shall report on its progress, accom- 21 plishments, findings, conclusions, recommendations, and activities to 22 the governor and to the legislature annually on or before the thirty- 23 first day of March of each year. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.